New York, session 2025-2026, A775.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property tax law is amended by adding a new 2 section 473 to read as follows: 3 § 473. Exemption for improvements to real property meeting certif- 4 ication standards for bird-friendly design. 1. For the purposes of this 5 section, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 6 (a) "Bird-friendly design" shall include: 7 (i) bird-friendly material; 8 (ii) bird hazard installations; and 9 (iii) fly-through conditions. 10 (b) "Bird-friendly material" shall mean a material or assembly that 11 has, or has been treated to have a maximum threat factor of twenty-five 12 in accordance with the American bird conservancy bird collision deter- 13 rence material threat factor reference standard, or with the American 14 bird conservancy bird-friendly materials evaluation program at Carnegie 15 museum's avian research center test protocol, or with a relevant ASTM 16 standard. 17 (c) "Bird hazard installations" shall mean monolithic glazing instal- 18 lations that provide a clear line of sight on the exterior of buildings, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02502-05-6 A. 775--B 2 1 including but not limited to glass awnings, glass handrails and guards, 2 glass wind break panels, or glass acoustic barriers. 3 (d) "Fly-through conditions" shall mean one or more panels of glass 4 that provide a clear line of sight through such elements creating the 5 illusion of a void leading to the other side, including parallel glass 6 elements, at a distance of seventeen feet (five thousand one hundred 7 eighty-two mm) or less, or a convergence of glass sides creating a 8 perpendicular, acute or obtuse corner. 9 2. Construction of improvements to real property initiated on or after 10 the first day of January, two thousand twenty-seven, meeting certif- 11 ication standards for bird-friendly design pursuant to subdivision one 12 of this section shall be exempt from taxation by any municipal corpo- 13 ration in cities of one million or more in which such property is 14 located to the extent provided in this section, provided that the 15 governing board of such municipal corporation, after conducting a public 16 hearing, adopts a local law, ordinance or resolution providing therefor. 17 3. Such real property, or portion thereof, which is certified under 18 bird-friendly design standards or a similar program using a certif- 19 ication standard which is equivalent to the categories of certified 20 bird-friendly design standards, as determined by an accredited profes- 21 sional, shall be exempt as provided below for the respective percent- 22 ages, provided that a municipal corporation may establish a maximum 23 exemption amount in its local law, ordinance or resolution, and 24 provided, further, that a copy of the certification for a qualified 25 category is filed with the assessor's office and is approved by the 26 assessor as meeting the requirements of this section and the municipal 27 corporation's local law, ordinance or resolution. Such exemption shall 28 be valued at the cost of the installation of bird-friendly building 29 materials used to build constructions or improvements in accordance with 30 bird-friendly design or certification. 31 BIRD-FRIENDLY DESIGN EXEMPTION 32 YEAR PERCENTAGE 33 1 100% 34 2 100% 35 3 100% 36 4 100% 37 5 100% 38 6 100% 39 7 80% 40 8 60% 41 9 40% 42 10 20% 43 4. (a) No such exemption shall be granted unless: 44 (i) such construction of improvements was commenced on or after the 45 first day of January, two thousand twenty-seven, or such later date as 46 may be specified by local law; 47 (ii) the value of such construction exceeds the sum of ten thousand 48 dollars; and 49 (iii) such construction is documented by a building permit, if 50 required, for the improvements, or other appropriate documentation as 51 required by the assessor. A. 775--B 3 1 (b) For purposes of this subdivision, the term "construction of 2 improvements" shall not include ordinary maintenance and repairs. 3 5. If the assessor is satisfied that the applicant is entitled to an 4 exemption pursuant to this section, such assessor shall approve the 5 application and such real property shall thereafter be exempt from taxa- 6 tion by the municipal corporation as provided in this section commencing 7 with the assessment roll prepared after the taxable status date. The 8 assessed value of any exemption granted pursuant to this section shall 9 be entered by the assessor on the assessment roll with the taxable prop- 10 erty, with the amount of the exemption shown in a separate column. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.